Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 17 Bonds of Executors, Administrators, and Guardians

33-17-1.
Conditions of bond.

Every executor, administrator, and guardian, before entering upon the execution of his or her trust, shall give bond to the probate court in any sum as it shall require, with sufficient surety or sureties, and with condition, except as provided in §§

33-17-3

and

33-17-4

, substantially as follows:

In the case of an executor or administrator with the will annexed:

To make and return to the probate court, as by law required, a true inventory of all the testator’s personal property which, at the time of making the inventory, shall have come to his or her possession or knowledge.

To administer according to law and the will of the testator, all the personal property of the testator which may come to his or her possession or into the possession of any person for him or her, and all rents and proceeds of real estate which may be received by him or her.

To render upon oath true accounts of his or her administration, as by law required.

In the case of an administrator:

To make and return to the probate court, as by law required, a true inventory of all the intestate’s personal property which, at the time of making the inventory, shall have come to his or her possession or knowledge.

To administer according to law all the personal property of the deceased and rents which may come into his or her possession or into the possession of any person for him or her.

To render upon oath true accounts of his or her administration, as by law required.

To deliver his or her letters of administration into the court if a will of the deceased is thereafter proved and allowed, and to settle his or her account in the probate court and to pay over and deliver all the assets remaining in his or her hands or due from him or her on settlement to the executor of the will.

In the case of a guardian of an estate:

To make and return to the probate court, as by law required, a true inventory of all the real and personal property of the ward which, at the time of making inventory, shall have come to his or her possession or knowledge.

To manage and dispose of all property according to law and for the best interests of the ward, and faithfully to perform his or her trust.

To render upon oath, as by law required, a true account of the property of his or her ward and of his or her management and disposition thereof.

At the expiration of his or her trust to settle his or her account in the probate court, or with the ward or his or her legal representative, and to pay over and deliver all the property remaining in his or her hands or due from him or her on settlement to the person entitled to the property.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1012; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-1

.

33-17-1.2.
When surety not required.

No surety shall be required on any bond, including surety on a bond for the sale of real estate, of an administrator of the estate of a person who died intestate, when the administrator is the surviving spouse or the sole heir of the decedent, or when the administrator is an heir-at-law of the decedent who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the probate court that circumstances warrant the waiver of surety and/or that no surety should be required. The probate court may require surety in any instance where it finds the circumstances so warrant such surety.

In making a determination as to whether surety should be required, the probate court’s consideration may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The total number of the decedent’s heirs at law;

The relationship of the heirs at law to one another;

The extent to which there appears to be issues and/or conflicts between the heirs at law in regard to the decedent’s estate, or the corresponding lack of such issues and/or conflicts; and

The total size, extent and monetary value of the decedent’s estate; and

In making a determination pursuant to provisions of this section, the court may conduct such hearings as it deems appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 484, § 2.

33-17-1.3.
When surety not required for guardians.

No surety shall be required on any bond of a guardian of the person and/or estate when the guardian is the spouse, parent, child, brother, sister, or other heir at law of the ward if the guardian demonstrates to the satisfaction of the probate court that circumstances warrant the waiver of surety and/or that no surety should be required.

In making a determination as to whether surety should be required for guardians, the probate court’s consideration may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The total number of the ward’s heirs at law;

The relationship of the ward’s heirs at law to one another;

The extent to which there appears to be issues and/or conflicts between the ward’s heirs at law in regard to the guardianship, or the corresponding lack of such issues and/or conflicts; and

The total size, extent, and monetary value of the ward’s estate.

In making a determination pursuant to the provision of this section, the court may conduct any hearings that it deems appropriate. The provisions of this section shall apply to both temporary and/or full guardianships.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 479, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 484, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 9.

33-17-2.
Meaning of condition in bond of “faithful performance”.

A condition in any bond given to the court requiring that the executor, administrator, or guardian, as the case may be, “shall faithfully perform his or her duties according to law as such fiduciary”, shall have the same force, meaning, and effect as a full recitation of the conditions imposed by the provisions of §

33-17-1

would have, if incorporated in the bond in full.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 371, § 1, as enacted by P.L. 1930, ch. 1537, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-2

.

33-17-3.
Bond to pay debts, legacies, and allowances.

Instead of the above bond, an executor, if so authorized by the will, or if he or she be the residuary legatee of the will, may give a bond to the probate court in a sum and with surety satisfactory to the court, and with condition to pay the funeral charges, debts and legacies of the testator and any allowance as may be made by the court for the support of the widow and family of the testator. In this case, an executor shall not be required to return an inventory, and an executor who is a residuary legatee need not render an account to the probate court. The giving of bond shall not discharge the lien on the real property of the testator for the payment of his or her debts, except on any part as may be sold by his or her executor or administrator with the will annexed to a purchaser in good faith and for valuable consideration; and all property not so sold may be taken on execution by a creditor not otherwise satisfied, in like manner as if a bond had been given in the other form.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1013; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 2; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-3

.

33-17-4.
Testamentary exemption from bond or surety.

An order or request in a will that an executor or guardian shall be exempt from giving bond or surety shall only exempt the executor or guardian from giving surety. The probate court, however, may require the executor or guardian at any time to give bond with surety or sureties.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1015; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-4

.

33-17-5.
Failure to give bond as declination of trust.

An executor, administrator, or guardian, required by the provisions of §§

33-17-1

—

33-17-4

to give bond, who for thirty (30) days after his or her appointment fails to file a bond approved by the court, may be adjudged to have declined the trust.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1017; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-5

.

33-17-6.
Defective bonds.

An executor, administrator or guardian who has given to the probate court an instrument purporting to be a bond, which has been accepted as a bond by the court having jurisdiction to accept it, shall be qualified as if he or she had given a proper bond, notwithstanding any defect in the instrument and notwithstanding any error committed in giving or accepting the bond; but nothing contained in this section shall affect the right of appeal in these cases or the right of the court to require a proper bond at any time. In case an appeal be sustained, the provisions of §

33-17-5

shall not apply, if a new and satisfactory bond be given within thirty (30) days after a final decree in the appeal.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1017; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-6

.

33-17-7.
Examination and approval of bond.

No bond required to be given to a probate court shall be accepted until it has been examined and approved by the court, or examined by the clerk and found to conform to the order of the court, and the approval of the court or clerk entered of record.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1018; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 7; P.L. 1915, ch. 1260, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 6; P.L. 1930, ch. 1537, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-7

.

33-17-8.
Joint fiduciaries.

Joint executors, administrators and guardians may give either a joint or several bond, or each may give a separate bond.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1019; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-8

.

33-17-9.
Bonds payable to and suable by court — Lost bonds.

All bonds required to be given to a probate court shall be made payable to the court, and shall be filed in the office of the probate clerk. In case a bond is lost, a copy of the record of it shall be admitted in evidence. These bonds shall be sued in the name of the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1020; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-9

.

33-17-10.
Requiring further bond or sureties.

If a bond given to a probate court is insufficient either in amount or security, the court shall require further bond, surety, or sureties of the executor, administrator, or guardian, and on his or her neglect or refusal to give further bond or sureties within the time fixed by the court, the court shall remove the executor, administrator, or guardian without further notice, and appoint an administrator or guardian, respectively, to succeed him or her.

In the event a probate court requires: (a) a fiduciary to file a bond with surety, and the amount is subsequently ordered to be increased; or (b) in the event a bond with surety is ordered for a temporary guardian, and the bond is ordered to be increased upon the entry/appointment of a permanent guardianship, the court may order the same bond to remain in effect and to be increased in an appropriate amount, as necessary.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1021; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-10

; P.L. 1999, ch. 484, § 2.

33-17-11.
Cancelation of bond — New bond.

A probate court, for cause shown, may cancel the bond of an executor, administrator, or guardian so as to relieve the principal and sureties for any breach thereafter committed, and may take and accept a new and sufficient bond in its stead.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1022; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-11

.

33-17-12.
Release of surety — New surety — Action by surety against principal.

Upon a bond taken by a probate court, the surety, or his or her heirs, executors, or administrators, may at any time make written application to the court for relief from further liability on the bond, and thereupon the court shall cause reasonable notice of the application to be given to the principal on the bond and to all persons whom the court shall find to be directly interested in the estate for the security of which the bond was given, to appear and be heard upon the application. If it appears that the petition can be granted without prejudice to the estate, the court may order the principal to give, within such time as it may limit, a new probate bond; and if the order is not complied with, may remove him or her and appoint a successor. If the new bonds be duly given and approved, the surety on the original bond and his or her representatives shall not be liable for any breach thereafter committed, nor shall the surety or sureties on the succeeding bond be liable for any default occurring prior to the approval of the new bond. In any case where the surety upon any bond has become liable on the bond, he or she shall have liberty to institute any proper suit against his or her principal for his or her protection.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1023; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-12

.

33-17-13.
Order to principal on bond to exhibit condition of estate.

A surety, or any other person interested in a probate bond, may at any time make written application to the court for an order requiring the principal to exhibit fully before the court the condition of the estate held by him or her, so that it may be ascertained whether or not the estate is being properly managed; and thereupon the court shall cause reasonable notice of the application to be given to the principal on the bond, and if, upon hearing, the court shall find that the application is made in good faith, it shall make the order. If the principal shall refuse to obey the order, or if, upon obeying it, the court shall find that the estate is not being properly managed by him or her, it shall remove him or her and appoint a successor.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1024; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-13

.

33-17-14.
Copies of bond — Suit in name of court.

Every person interested in a bond given to a probate court shall be entitled to a copy of the bond on payment of the fee therefor, and to sue on the bond in the name of the court to which the bond is given.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1025; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-14

.

33-17-15.
Beneficiaries of suit on bond shown — Costs.

The writ, in addition to the usual indorsement of the name of the plaintiff and attorney, if there be one, shall also have written thereon the name or names of the person or persons for whose benefit the suit is brought, who shall give surety for costs as in other cases, and against whom, if the defendant recover, execution for costs shall issue.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1026; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-15

.

33-17-16.
Facts to be shown by creditor suing on bond.

If a suit is brought by a creditor of the deceased person, he or she shall show:

That his or her claim has been duly filed;

That his or her claim has not been disallowed by the executor or administrator, or has been established by commissioners, or by judgment; and

That a decree of unfaithful administration has been entered as provided in §

33-17-17

, and if the estate be insolvent, he or she shall also produce a copy of the order of distribution.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1027; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-16

.

33-17-17.
Decree of unfaithful administration.

If any executor or administrator shall neglect or refuse to raise money out of the estate by collecting debts due or by selling the personal estate, or the real estate, if need be, and has power, or can obtain leave, to sell the same, or shall neglect or refuse to pay over what he or she has in his or her hands to the several creditors of the testator or intestate whose claims have been filed and allowed or proved according to law, or shall otherwise fail to perform his or her duties as executor or administrator, and, after citation before the probate court, shall fail to show reasonable cause therefor, the court may decree that he or she is guilty of unfaithful administration; and thereupon an action may be brought upon the bond of the executor or administrator by any creditor who may have been damnified thereby.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1028; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-17

.

33-17-18.
Evidence in action by distributee.

If the suit be brought by a distributee for his or her part of the personal estate, he or she shall exhibit a copy of the decree of the probate court, ascertaining its amount, and prove that he or she has made a demand therefor upon the administrator.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1029; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-18

.

33-17-19.
Hearing and judgment of forfeiture of bond.

Upon a hearing upon the forfeiture of a bond, the court shall examine the claims of the several persons whose names are indorsed upon the writ, and judgment shall be rendered for those persons, respectively, for the amount so ascertained to be due to each (but with only one bill of costs, each claimant, however, being allowed fees of witnesses called in his or her behalf), in form, substantially, that the probate court shall have execution for the judgment to the use of the persons in whose favor judgment shall be rendered.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1030; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-19

.

33-17-20.
Execution on judgment of forfeiture.

Any person to whose use judgment shall be rendered in the name of the probate court as provided in §

33-17-19

may sue out execution thereon and have the execution levied according to law, and shall be deemed to be the creditor to every intent and purpose whatsoever.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1031; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-20

.

33-17-21.
Addition of parties to suit for forfeiture.

During the pendency of a forfeiture suit, the court may, on motion, permit any person interested to become a party to the suit by indorsing his or her name on the writ, and by giving surety for costs, if required; and thereupon the person shall have the same rights and be subject to the same liabilities as if his or her name had been indorsed upon the writ before the service thereof.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1032; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-21

.

33-17-22.
Action on judgment for penalty.

After judgment for the penalty of a bond, any person interested, upon giving surety for costs as in other cases, may bring a civil action on the judgment; and upon proof of his or her claim may have judgment so that an execution shall issue to his or her use.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1033; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-22

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 61.

33-17-23.
Obligors not released by judgment on bond.

No suit or judgment on a bond shall abate or bar any suit thereon against any obligor against whom no suit has been commenced or judgment rendered.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1034; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-23

.

33-17-24.
Suit on bond following judgment for obligor.

A judgment in favor of the obligor shall in no case bar any suit on a bond for the benefit of a different claimant or of the same claimant for a different claim.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1035; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-24

.

33-17-25.
Suit for benefit of all interested in estate.

A suit may also be brought on a bond for the benefit of all concerned in the estate at the instance of any party interested, who shall give surety for costs to the defendant on the writ, and satisfactory bond to the probate court securing the court against expenses and costs; in which case, indorsement that the suit is brought for the benefit of all interested in the estate shall be made upon the writ.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1036; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-25

.

33-17-26.
Suit on bond for failure to inventory or account for property.

Suit on a probate bond, except the bond authorized by §

33-17-3

, may be brought whenever it shall appear that the administrator or the executor has received the personal estate of the testator or intestate and has not, after being cited by the court to do so, exhibited upon oath a particular inventory of the estate, or has refused or neglected to account upon oath for the property of the testator or intestate by him or her received.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1037; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-26

.

33-17-27.
Judgment and execution in suit for failure to inventory or account.

In the cases mentioned in §

33-17-26

, judgment shall be rendered against the executor or administrator so in default for the full penalty of the bond; and, upon a hearing upon forfeiture, the court shall award execution against the executor or administrator in favor of the probate court for the full value of the personal estate of the deceased proved to have come to his or her hands, or, in case he or she has once accounted, remaining or being in his or her hands at and since the last accounting, without any discount, abatement, or allowance for charges and expenses of administration.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1038; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-27

.

33-17-28.
Administration of amount recovered in suit for failure to inventory or account.

In case of a recovery, the amount so recovered shall be deemed to be the property of the testator or intestate, and, after paying therefrom all expenses of recovery, shall be administered by a new administrator to be appointed for that purpose.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1039; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-28

.

33-17-29.
Consolidation of suits against joint fiduciaries — Execution.

Whenever suits are brought upon separate bonds of joint executors, administrators, or guardians, they may be consolidated. If judgment for the penal sum is obtained upon more than one of the bonds, one execution shall issue for the amount found due for defaults for which two (2) or more principals on the bonds are found liable, and separate executions shall issue for the amount found due for all individual defaults of either of the principals.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 1040; G.L. 1909, ch. 320, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 371, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 576, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

33-17-29

.